Colorado, session 2026A, SB093.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 8-41-213 as
follows:
8-41-213. Declaration of workers' compensation required -
building permit - construction permit - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "APPLICANT" MEANS A PERSON APPLYING FOR A PERMIT WITH THE
PERMITTING AGENCY OF A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) "DECLARATION" MEANS A FORM DESIGNATED BY THE DIVISION
AND AVAILABLE ON THE DIVISION'S WEBSITE THAT ENSURES ANY PERSON,
INCLUDING ANY SUBCONTRACTORS, WORKING UNDER A PERMIT MAINTAINS
WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLES 40 TO 47 OF THIS TITLE 8 FOR THE DURATION OF
THE WORK PERFORMED UNDER THE PERMIT.
(c) (I) "GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY" MEANS THE STATE, A COUNTY, A
MUNICIPALITY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE.
(II) "GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY" DOES NOT INCLUDE A SPECIAL
DISTRICT.
(d) "PERMIT" MEANS A BUILDING PERMIT OR CONSTRUCTION PERMIT
FOR A PROJECT WITH A TOTAL CONSTRUCTION COST OF MORE THAN ONE
MILLION DOLLARS, EXCEPT FOR A PERMIT ISSUED BY THE DIVISION OF
PROFESSIONS AND OCCUPATIONS IN THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY
AGENCIES.
(2) PRIOR TO COMMENCING ANY WORK UNDER A PERMIT, AN
APPLICANT SHALL FILE A SIGNED DECLARATION UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY
WITH THE PERMITTING AGENCY ENSURING THAT ANY PERSON, INCLUDING
ANY SUBCONTRACTORS, WORKING UNDER THE PERMIT MAINTAINS WORKERS'
COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLES 40 TO 47 OF THIS TITLE 8 FOR THE DURATION OF
THE WORK PERFORMED UNDER THE PERMIT.
(3) A PERSON MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE DIVISION ALLEGING
A PERSON'S WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE IS NOT IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLES 40 TO 47 OF THIS TITLE
8.
SECTION 2. Applicability. This act applies to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this act, including determinations of permit
or license applications pending on the effective date.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-093

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-093